Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-202.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Barber Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Barber shall mean any person who engages in the practice of any act of barbering;

(2) Barber pole shall mean a cylinder or pole with alternating stripes of red, white, and blue or any combination of them which run diagonally along the length of the cylinder or pole;

(3) Barber shop shall mean (a) an establishment or place of business properly licensed as required by the act where one or more persons properly licensed are engaged in the practice of barbering or (b) a mobile barber shop. Barber shop shall not include barber schools or colleges;

(4) Barber school or college shall mean an establishment properly licensed and operated for the teaching and training of barber students;

(5) Board shall mean the Board of Barber Examiners;

(6) Manager shall mean a licensed barber having control of the barber shop and of the persons working at or employed by the barber shop;

(7) License shall mean a certificate of registration issued by the board;

(8) Barber instructor shall mean a teacher of the barber trade as provided in the act;

(9) Assistant barber instructor shall mean a teacher of the barbering trade registered as an assistant barber instructor as required by the act;

(10) Mobile barber shop shall mean a self-contained, self-supporting, enclosed mobile unit licensed under the act as a mobile site for the performance of the practice of barbering by persons licensed under the act;

(11) Registered or licensed barber shall mean a person who has completed the requirements to receive a certificate as a barber and to whom a certificate has been issued;

(12) Secretary of the board shall mean the director appointed by the board who shall keep a record of the proceedings of the board;

(13) Student shall mean a person attending an approved, licensed barber school or college, duly registered with the board as a student engaged in learning and acquiring any and all of the practices of barbering, and who, while learning, performs and assists any of the practices of barbering in a barber school or college; and

(14) Postsecondary barber school or college shall mean an establishment properly licensed and operated for the teaching and training of barber students who have successfully completed high school or its equivalent as determined by successfully passing a general educational development test prior to admittance.

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 5;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 226, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB46, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB842, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 79;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 24.